Hawaii statutes.
§603-21.6 Probate. The several circuit
courts shall have power to:

(1) Grant probate of wills;

(2) Appoint personal representatives;

(3) Determine the heirs at law or devisees of
deceased persons and to decree the distribution of decedents' estates;

(4) Appoint guardians for incapacitated adults;

(5) Appoint conservators;

(6) Compel personal representatives and such
guardians and conservators to perform their respective trusts and to account in
all respects for the discharge of their official duties;

(7) Remove any personal representative or any such
guardian or conservator; and

(8) Do all other things as provided in chapter 560.
[L 1972, c 88, §3(j); am L 1976, c 200, pt of §1; am L 2004, c 161, §34]

Rules of Court

See Hawaii Probate Rules.

Case Notes

Cited: 77 H. 251 (App.), 883 P.2d 673 (1994).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next